Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2314
Remedy; not exclusive.

The remedy provided by the Disposition of Personal Property Landlord and Tenant Act shall not be exclusive and shall not preclude the landlord or the tenant from pursuing any other remedy provided by law.

Laws 1991, LB 36, § 14.